Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.900

Chapter supplemental—Application of other laws.

This chapter provides a complete, additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

[ 1983 c 169 s 15.]